New York, session 2025-2026, A3277.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Samuel 4 Trombley. The bridge at the intersection of state route eleven and 5 state route one hundred ninety, designated bridge number 1039640 971LX, 6 which crosses over the north branch of the Great Chazy River, in the 7 town of Ellenburg, county of Clinton, shall be dedicated to Samuel 8 Trombley. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Samuel Trombley". However, to 13 avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the 14 dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one 15 of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge shall not be 16 changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07112-02-5